Utah statutes.
41-6a-1205.   Railroad grade crossings -- Certain vehicles must stop -- Exceptions -- Rules.

(1) An operator of a commercial motor vehicle, as defined under Section 53-3-102, shall upon approaching a railroad grade crossing:

(a)  unless Subsection (2) applies, slow down and check that the tracks are clear of an approaching train;

(b)  stop within 50 feet, but not closer than 15 feet, from the nearest rail of the railroad track before reaching the crossing if the tracks are not clear;

(c)  obey all traffic control devices or the directions of a peace officer, or other  crossing official at the crossing; and

(d)  before proceeding over a railroad grade crossing:

(i)  ensure that the vehicle has sufficient space to drive completely through a railroad grade crossing without stopping; and

(ii)  ensure that the vehicle has sufficient undercarriage clearance to safely and completely pass through the crossing.

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), the operator of a vehicle described in 49 CFR 392.10 shall stop within 50 feet, but not closer than 15 feet, from the nearest rail of the railroad track before crossing, at grade, any track of a railroad.

(b)  While stopped, the operator shall look in both directions along the track for any sign of an approaching train and look and listen for signals indicating the approach of any train.

(c)  The operator may proceed across the railroad track only when the movement may be made with reasonable safety.

(d)  After stopping as required and upon safely proceeding, the operator shall only cross the railroad track in a gear that ensures no necessity for manually changing gears while traversing the crossing.

(e)  The operator may not manually shift gears while crossing the railroad track.

(3)  This section does not apply at a:

(a)  railroad grade crossing where traffic is controlled by a peace officer or other crossing official;

(b)  railroad grade crossing where traffic is regulated by a traffic-control signal;

(c)  railroad grade crossing where a traffic-control device gives notice that the stopping  requirements of this section are not applicable; or

(d)  other railroad grade crossings excluded under 49 CFR 392.10.

